District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.03

Retirement age; continuous employment requirements.

Any teacher who shall have reached the age of 62 may be retired by the Board of Education on its own motion, or shall be retired if application is made by the teacher. Any teacher who shall have reached the age of 70 shall be retired unless, in the judgment of two thirds of the Board of Education, such teacher should be longer retained for the good of the service; provided, that no sum shall be paid to any teacher upon his retirement under the provisions of this section unless he shall have been continuously employed as a teacher in the public schools of the District of Columbia from the time of his attainment of the age of 52 years.

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 388, ch. 39, § 3
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 728, ch. 556, § 1
1973 Ed., § 31-703.
1981 Ed., § 31-1203.
This section is referenced in § 38-2001.05 and § 38-2001.09.